Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.201

Responsibility for conduct of subordinates.

Responsibility for any real estate broker, managing broker, or branch manager in conduct covered by this chapter shall rest with the designated broker to which such licensees shall be licensed.

In addition to the designated broker, a branch manager shall bear responsibility for brokers and managing brokers operating under the branch manager at a branch office.

[ 2008 c 23 s 20; 1997 c 322 s 12; 1977 ex.s. c 370 s 6; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 14. Formerly RCW 18.85.155.]